Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 18. Joint Commission on Health Care.

§ 30-168.
Joint Commission on Health Care; purpose.

The Joint Commission on Health Care (the Commission) is established in the legislative branch of state government. The purpose of the Commission is to study, report and make recommendations on all areas of health care provision, regulation, insurance, liability, licensing, and delivery of services. In so doing, the Commission shall endeavor to ensure that the Commonwealth as provider, financier, and regulator adopts the most cost-effective and efficacious means of delivery of health care services so that the greatest number of Virginians receive quality health care. Further, the Commission shall encourage the development of uniform policies and services to ensure the availability of quality, affordable and accessible health services and provide a forum for continuing the review and study of programs and services.

The Commission may make recommendations and coordinate the proposals and recommendations of all commissions and agencies as to legislation affecting the provision and delivery of health care.

For the purposes of this chapter, “health care” shall include behavioral health care.

History.

1992, cc. 799, 818, §§ 9-311, 9-312, 9-314; 2001, c. 844; 2003, c. 633.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 799, cl. 3 provides: “That whenever any reference is made in law or other provision approved by the General Assembly to the former Joint Subcommittee or the former Commission on Health Care for All Virginians, such reference shall be construed to apply mutatis mutandis to the Joint Commission on Health Care.”

Acts 2003, c. 633, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2007, the Senate Committee on Privileges and Elections and the Speaker of the House of Delegates shall each appoint one member to the Joint Commission on Health Care, as authorized by this act, from among the former members of the Joint Commission on Behavioral Health Care.”

Acts 2003, c. 633, cl. 4 provides: “That whenever any reference is made in law or other provision approved by the General Assembly to the former Joint Commission on Behavioral Health Care, such reference shall be construed to apply mutatis mutandis to the Joint Commission on Health Care.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 633, in the first paragraph, deleted the subsection A designation and inserted “financier” in the third sentence and added the last paragraph; and deleted former subsections B through F, concerning membership, terms, chairman and vice chairman, compensation, and staffing.

§ 30-168.1.
Membership; terms; vacancies; chairman and vice-chairman; quorum; meetings.

The Commission shall consist of 18 legislative members. Members shall be appointed as follows: eight members of the Senate, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and 10 members of the House of Delegates, of whom three shall be members of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates.

Members of the Commission shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Members may be reappointed. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

No recommendation of the Commission shall be adopted if a majority of the Senate members or a majority of the House members appointed to the Commission (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Commission.

History.

2003, c. 633; 2005, c. 758.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 758 substituted “Rules” for “Privileges and Elections” in the first paragraph; in the second paragraph, inserted the present second sentence and deleted the third sentence, which formerly read: “The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment”; and added the last paragraph.

§ 30-168.2.
Compensation; expenses.

Members of the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12. All members shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Joint Commission on Health Care.

History.

2003, c. 633.

§ 30-168.3.
Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To study and gather information and data to accomplish its purposes as set forth in § 30-168;

To study the operations, management, jurisdiction, powers and interrelationships of any department, board, bureau, commission, authority or other agency with any direct responsibility for the provision and delivery of health care in the Commonwealth;

To examine matters relating to health care services in other states and to consult and exchange information with officers and agencies of other states with respect to health service problems of mutual concern;

To maintain offices and hold meetings and functions at any place within the Commonwealth that it deems necessary;

To invite other interested parties to sit with the Commission and participate in its deliberations;

To appoint a special task force from among the members of the Commission to study and make recommendations on issues related to behavioral health care to the full Commission; and

To report its recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor annually and to make such interim reports as it deems advisable or as may be required by the General Assembly and the Governor.

History.

2003, c. 633.

§ 30-168.4.
Staffing.

The Commission may appoint, employ, and remove an executive director and such other persons as it deems necessary, and determine their duties and fix their salaries or compensation within the amounts appropriated therefor. The Commission may also employ experts who have special knowledge of the issues before it. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Commission, upon request.

History.

2003, c. 633.

§ 30-168.5.
Chairman’s executive summary of activity and work of the Commission.

The chairman of the Commission shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Commission no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2003, c. 633.

§ 30-169.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 633, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-169, which specified certain powers and duties of the Commission, was derived from Acts 1992, cc. 799, 818, §§ 9-313, 9-315; 2001, c. 844.

§ 30-169.1.
Cooperation of other state agencies and political subdivisions.

The Commission may request and shall receive from every department, division, board, bureau, commission, authority or other agency created by the Commonwealth, or to which the Commonwealth is party, or from any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, cooperation and assistance in the performance of its duties.

History.

2004, c. 296.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2004 act having been 30-170.1.

§ 30-170.
Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 315, cl. 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-17, which contained a sunset provision for Chapter 18 of this title, derived from 1992, cc. 799, 818, § 9-316; 1996, c. 772; 2001, cc. 187, 844; 2006, cc. 113, 178; 2009, c. 707; 2011, cc. 501, 607; 2014, cc. 280, 518; 2017, cc. 173, 608.